District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.40

Distributions prohibited.

(a)

Except as permitted under § 29-404.22 or § 29-404.41, a nonprofit corporation shall not pay dividends or make distributions of any part of its assets, income, or profits to its members, directors, delegates, members of a designated body, or officers.

(b)

This section shall not apply to a contract or transaction authorized pursuant to § 29-406.70.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720